Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1077.
do enact as follows:AB1077,11Section 1. 20.455 (2) (gr) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2240, is amended to read:AB1077,3,2320.455 (2) (gr) Handgun purchaser record check; permits for firearms dealers; 4and checks for licenses or certifications to carry concealed weapons. All moneys 5received as fee payments under ss. 165.64 (2) (f) and (3) (b), 175.35 (2i) (2) (a) 3., 1175.49 (5m), and 175.60 (7) (c) and (d), (13), and (15) (b) 4. a. and b. to provide 2services under ss. 165.28, 165.64, 175.35, 175.37, 175.49, and 175.60.AB1077,23Section 2. 20.455 (2) (gs) of the statutes is created to read:AB1077,3,5420.455 (2) (gs) Permits for firearms dealers. A sum sufficient to administer ss. 5165.64, 175.35, and 175.37.AB1077,36Section 3. 51.20 (13) (cv) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1077,3,19751.20 (13) (cv) 4. If the court orders a subject individual not to possess a 8firearm under subd. 1. or cancels under subd. 1m. c. an order issued under subd. 1. 9or under s. 51.20 (13) (cv) 1., 2007 stats., the court clerk shall notify the department 10of justice of that fact and provide any information identifying the subject individual 11that is necessary to permit an accurate firearms restrictions record search under s. 12175.35 (2g) (c) (2) (a) 3., a background check under s. 175.60 (9g) (a), or an accurate 13response under s. 165.63. No other information from the subject individual’s court 14records may be disclosed to the department of justice except by order of the court. 15The department of justice may disclose information provided under this subdivision 16only to respond to a request under s. 165.63, as part of a firearms restrictions record 17search under s. 175.35 (2g) (c) (2) (a) 3., under rules the department of justice 18promulgates under s. 175.35 (2g) (d), or as part of a background check under s. 19175.60 (9g) (a).AB1077,420Section 4. 51.45 (13) (i) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1077,4,82151.45 (13) (i) 4. If the court orders under subd. 1. a person not to possess a 22firearm or cancels under subd. 2. c. an order issued under subd. 1., the court clerk 23shall notify the department of justice of the order or cancellation and provide any 24information identifying the person that is necessary to permit an accurate firearms 1restrictions record search under s. 175.35 (2g) (c) (2) (a) 3., a background check 2under s. 175.60 (9g) (a), or an accurate response under s. 165.63. No other 3information from the person’s court records may be disclosed to the department of 4justice except by order of the court. The department of justice may disclose 5information provided under this subdivision only to respond to a request under s. 6165.63, as part of a firearms restrictions record search under s. 175.35 (2g) (c) (2) (a) 73., under rules the department of justice promulgates under s. 175.35 (2g) (d), or as 8part of a background check under s. 175.60 (9g) (a).AB1077,59Section 5. 54.10 (3) (f) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1077,4,211054.10 (3) (f) 4. If the court orders under subd. 1. an individual not to possess 11a firearm or cancels under subd. 2. c. an order issued under subd. 1., the court clerk 12shall notify the department of justice of the order or cancellation and provide any 13information identifying the individual that is necessary to permit an accurate 14firearms restrictions record search under s. 175.35 (2g) (c) (2) (a) 3., a background 15check under s. 175.60 (9g) (a), or an accurate response under s. 165.63. No other 16information from the individual’s court records may be disclosed to the department 17of justice except by order of the court. The department of justice may disclose 18information provided under this subdivision only to respond to a request under s. 19165.63, as part of a firearms restrictions record search under s. 175.35 (2g) (c) (2) (a) 203., under rules the department of justice promulgates under s. 175.35 (2g) (d), or as 21part of a background check under s. 175.60 (9g) (a).AB1077,622Section 6. 55.12 (10) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1077,5,102355.12 (10) (d) If the court orders under par. (a) an individual not to possess a 24firearm or cancels under par. (b) 3. an order issued under par. (a), the court clerk 1shall notify the department of justice of the order or cancellation and provide any 2information identifying the individual that is necessary to permit an accurate 3firearms restrictions record search under s. 175.35 (2g) (c) (2) (a) 3., a background 4check under s. 175.60 (9g) (a), or an accurate response under s. 165.63. No other 5information from the individual’s court records may be disclosed to the department 6of justice except by order of the court. The department of justice may disclose 7information provided under this paragraph only to respond to a request under s. 8165.63, as part of a firearms restrictions record search under s. 175.35 (2g) (c) (2) (a) 93., under rules the department of justice promulgates under s. 175.35 (2g) (d), or as 10part of a background check under s. 175.60 (9g) (a).AB1077,711Section 7. 66.05115 of the statutes is created to read:AB1077,5,131266.05115 Tracing and ballistics requirements for law enforcement. 13(1) In this section:AB1077,5,1814(a) “eTrace” means the Internet-based system under the federal bureau of 15alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explosives that allows a participating law 16enforcement agency to submit firearm traces and receive firearm trace results, 17search all firearm traces submitted by their agency, and perform analytical 18functions, or its successor system.AB1077,5,2019(b) “National integrated ballistic information network system” includes a 20successor system.AB1077,5,2121(c) “Recovered firearm” has the meaning given in s. 165.64 (1) (h).AB1077,5,2222(2) Each law enforcement agency shall participate in eTrace.AB1077,5,2423(3) If a law enforcement agency is in possession of a recovered firearm, the law 24enforcement agency shall do all of the following:AB1077,6,21(a) Submit a firearm trace request to eTrace for the recovered firearm within 248 hours of recovery. The request shall include all of the following:AB1077,6,631. The address of the location from which the firearm was recovered, a brief 4description of how the law enforcement agency came into possession of the 5recovered firearm, and any crime that may have been committed with the recovered 6firearm.AB1077,6,972. Information about the person who last possessed the recovered firearm, 8including the person’s name, birthdate, sex, last known address, and any affiliation 9with persons who have been convicted of a crime.AB1077,6,11103. The make model, caliber or gauge, manufacture, and serial number of the 11recovered firearm. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1077 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1077 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1077 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1077 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1077: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting